Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1006
Board of directors; selection; bylaws; adopt.

Immediately following the granting of incorporation by the county board, the owners of land within any such district shall select from their number a board of directors. The number of members on such board, not to exceed nine, shall be determined by majority vote of those owners of land present; Provided, any original director who shall fail to subscribe to one or more benefit units and pay the established unit fee for each unit to which he subscribes within thirty days after entry in the minutes of the board of a declaration of availability of such benefit units for subscription, shall forfeit his office. Within thirty days after the election of the original board, proposed bylaws shall be submitted for adoption at a special meeting of owners of land located within the district, written notice of which shall be mailed to each such landowner. Those owners of land located within the district present at such special meeting may adopt and amend any of such proposed bylaws and may propose and adopt additional or other bylaws. Such bylaws may be amended at any annual or special meeting of the participating members of the district.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 6, p. 750.